Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Inspection for Brands and Ownership
§ 11-20-223.
Out-of-state accustomed range permits.

The board may issue an out-of-state accustomed range permit for the movement of livestock from an accustomed range or ranch in Wyoming to a noncontiguous accustomed range or ranch in another state provided the applicant and the accustomed range meet the requirements of this subsection and criteria established by rules of the board. The movement shall be for the purpose of pasturing, grazing, ranging or feeding the livestock or other board approved movement that is considered necessary for normal ranch management operating conditions. The movement shall not be for the purpose of changing ownership. A permit under this section may be issued only to bona fide owners or Wyoming resident lessees of ranch lands headquartered within Wyoming or their authorized employees. As used in this section, an “out-of-state accustomed range or ranch” means a range or ranch that has been used for a period of time or purpose specified by the board and which use can be verified by brand inspection records. A permit may be denied by the board after a finding that the person applying for a permit has violated a brand inspection law, including a provision of this section or a board rule or regulation.

No person shall move animals pursuant to a permit under this section until a brand inspector has inspected the animals and collected the fee imposed by W.S.

11-20-402

. The owner of livestock moved under the permit shall attest in writing that it is intended that the livestock shall be returned to this state prior to a change in ownership. If a change of ownership occurs before the livestock are returned to this state, the owner shall notify the brand inspector who performed the inspection and shall pay all fees imposed under W.S.

11-6-210

and

11-20-401

with credit granted for any fee imposed by W.S.

11-20-402

(a)(viii).

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 13 § 2.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 25, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204; 2013 ch. 13, §
2., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (c), which read: “Each permit issued under this section shall be good for the calendar year in which it is issued unless sooner revoked for cause by the board. Permits shall be nontransferable. A permit may be suspended or revoked by the board after a finding that the person to whom the permit is granted has violated a brand inspection law, including a provision of this section, or a board rule or regulation. If there are written complaints from three (3) or more affected parties to the board concerning the use of the permit, the board shall investigate the complaints and take appropriate action.”

The 2013 amendment

repealed former (e), relating to rules and regulations promulgated prior to July 1, 2004.

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2002, repealed and recreated former §

11-20-223

, relating to rules regarding permits for moving animals to an out-of-state accustomed range, as present §

11-20-223

.

§ 11-20-224.
Permanent
brand inspection certificate; application; surrender to board.

The owner of livestock
used for rodeo, show, racing, pleasure or Wyoming farm or ranch work
purposes may obtain a permanent brand inspection certificate authorizing
movement of the livestock intrastate or interstate, valid for the
life of the livestock or until a change of ownership takes place,
upon approval of a proper application in writing by an authorized
Wyoming brand inspector. The application shall contain, or be accompanied
by, valid proof of ownership of the livestock by the applicant, and
shall include a thorough physical description including all brands
carried by the livestock and all distinguishing marks or markings.
The possession of a valid permanent brand inspection certificate shall
constitute prima facie evidence of ownership. Upon any change in ownership
the certificate is void.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 18; 1953, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-350; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 9; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1971, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-203

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “include” for “state” preceding “a thorough physical description”, in the last sentence deleted “, the owner shall transfer in writing the permanent brand inspection certificate to the new owner who shall obtain an inspection within 7 (seven) days of the transfer, or” and deleted “and shall be immediately surrendered to the board.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 3, states as follows: “The brand recording and inspection fees specified in this act shall remain at the levels in effect on July 1, 2007, and shall not be adjusted before December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, the board may adjust the fees specified in this act subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 11-20-408(b).”

§ 11-20-225.
Annual horse brand inspection certificate; surrender to board; fee.

The owner of a horse or livestock used for rodeo, show, racing, pleasure or farm or ranch work in Wyoming which is permanently and individually identified may obtain an annual brand inspection certificate, authorizing movement from county to county within Wyoming, valid for one (1) year from date of issuance unless sooner terminated by a change in ownership of the horse described therein. Upon any change of ownership the certificate is void and must be immediately surrendered to the board.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 26, § 2.

For each permit issued under this section there shall be charged an inspection fee established by W.S. 11-20-402(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-353; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 10; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-204

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 43, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2001, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “board,” see §

11-20-101

.

As to general duties of board in regard to inspection for brands and ownership, see §

11-20-202

.

§ 11-20-226.
Certificates
to be signed and in possession.

The inspection certificate
and movement permit issued pursuant to W.S.

11-20-224

or

11-20-225

is not valid unless signed by an authorized representative
of the board and by the permit holder. The certificate shall be in
the possession of the person transporting the horse and shall be shown
on request to any person authorized to enforce the brand inspection
laws.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-353; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 10; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-204

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “shall” for “must” twice and deleted the last sentence.

§ 11-20-227.
Fraudulent
use of inspection certificate and movement permit; penalties.

Fraudulent use of an
inspection certificate and movement permit issued pursuant to W.S.

11-20-224

,

11-20-225

or

11-20-230

is punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred
dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30)
days, or both. The fraudulent use of an inspection certificate and
movement permit issued pursuant to W.S.

11-20-224

,

11-20-225

or

11-20-230

is probable cause to investigate the commission of a
felony, and the provisions of W.S.

11-20-228

may be invoked pending the outcome of the investigation
and court proceedings, if any.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 18; 1953, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-350; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 9; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1971, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-203

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2006, ch. 39, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “or

11-20-230

” in two places and made related changes.

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

§ 11-20-228.
Impounding of vehicles; lien.

Any vehicle used in the
transportation of livestock in violation of this act may be impounded
pending determination of the violation by a court. Upon conviction
of the owner of the vehicle, or the owner of the livestock being transported,
any expense incurred by an authorized officer for towing the vehicle
or for feed and care of the livestock is a lien upon the vehicle or
livestock until the expenses are paid in full.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-348; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 7; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-201

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-20-101(a)(vii).

§ 11-20-229.
Penalties
for violation of certain provisions.

Any violation of the
provisions of W.S.

11-20-202

through

11-20-226

and

11-20-230

for which there is no specific penalty prescribed is
punishable as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 60, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-370.3; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-221; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 1992, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “and

11-20-230

.”

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

§ 11-20-230.
Livestock
seed stock and exhibitors permit; fees; transfers; reports; enforcement.

Any Wyoming livestock producer who raises and markets livestock for the purpose of providing breeding seed stock or exhibition animals, as defined by the board for purposes of this section, may apply to the board for a livestock seed stock or exhibition stock permit. The fee shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) per permit. The permit shall be valid for the calendar year issued and no transactions or shipments shall be authorized until a permit has been issued.

After receiving a certificate of inspection from a Wyoming brand inspector, the livestock producer may sell or change ownership of the livestock provided the livestock are branded with the livestock producer’s recorded Wyoming brand and the animals can be individually identified by a board approved method. The livestock may then be legally shipped or removed from any county in Wyoming to any other county, state or country, provided they are accompanied by a board authorized bill of sale and a board issued fleet permit which references the prior certificate of inspection pursuant to W.S.

11-20-216

.

The permit holder shall report all transactions and movements and shall pay any applicable fees authorized pursuant to W.S.

11-6-210

,

11-37-106

and

11-37-107

to the brand inspector who issued the original brand certificate, or any other designated agent of the board, within three (3) working days of the transaction.

Failure to comply with this section or any other applicable law or board rule shall be grounds for the revocation of the permit and shall be punished pursuant to W.S.

11-1-103

. Providing false proof of ownership shall be grounds for the revocation of the permit and shall be punished pursuant to W.S.

11-20-208

. All livestock covered under the permit authorized under this section are subject to reinspection by a board authorized brand inspector and any applicable fees shall be assessed.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 39, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 39, § 4, appropriates from the general fund fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, to the Wyoming livestock board for the expenses of the task force created by this act.